New Jersey, session 221, A3614.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. The Commissioner of Health shall appoint a chief executive nurse within the Department of Health who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner during the commissioner's term of office and until the appointment of the Chief Executive Nurses successor. The Chief Executive Nurse shall devote his or her entire time to the duties of the position.  The Chief Executive Nurse shall hold a masters degree in nursing or higher and have significant work experience as a nurse. b.    It shall be the duty of the Chief Executive Nurse to:  assist the Commissioner of Health as necessary on matters pertaining to nursing; collect data and other information on nursing as determined by the Commissioner of Health; consult with nurses and health care facilities to determine which current or proposed regulations aide or impede nurses ability to provide adequate health care; and evaluate current trends in nursing. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.